Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.134

Permanent placement of child.

If reasonable efforts are not ordered under RCW 13.34.132, a permanency planning hearing shall be held within thirty days of the court order to file a petition to terminate parental rights. Reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan, and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

[ 2000 c 122 s 17.]